North Carolina statutes. Chapter 43. Land Registration.
Article 5. Adverse Claims and Corrections after Registration.

§ 43-26.
Limitations.

No decree of registration heretofore entered, and no certificate of title heretofore issued pursuant thereto, shall be adjudged invalid, revoked, or set aside, unless the action or proceeding in which the validity of such decree of registration or certificate of title issued pursuant thereto is attacked or called in question be commenced or the defense alleging the invalidity thereof be interposed within 12 months from March 10, 1919.

No decree of registration hereafter entered and no certificate of title hereafter issued pursuant thereto shall be adjudged invalid or revoked or set aside, unless the action or proceeding in which the validity of such decree or of the certificate of title issued pursuant thereto is attacked or called in question be commenced or the defense alleging the invalidity thereof be interposed within 12 months from the date of such decree.

No action or proceeding for the recovery of any right, title, interest, or estate in registered land adverse to the title established and adjudicated by any decree of registration heretofore entered shall be maintained unless such action or proceeding be commenced within 12 months from the date last mentioned; and no action or proceeding for the recovery of any right, title, interest, estate in registered land, adverse to the right established by any decree of registration hereafter shall be maintained unless such action or proceeding be commenced within 12 months from the date of such decree.

No action or proceeding for the enforcement or foreclosure of any lien upon or charge against registered land which existed at the date when any decree of registration was heretofore entered, and which was not recognized or established by such decree, shall be maintained, unless such action or proceeding be commenced within 12 months from the date above mentioned; and no action or proceeding for the enforcement or foreclosure of any lien upon or charge against registered land in existence at the date of any decree of registration hereafter entered, and which is not recognized and established by such decree, shall be maintained, unless such action or proceeding be commenced within 12 months from the date of such decree.

History.

1919, c. 236, s. 1; C.S., s. 2400.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1979 property law, see 58 N.C.L. Rev. 1509 (1980).

§ 43-27.
Adverse claim subsequent to registry; affidavit of claim prerequisite to enforcement; limitation.

Any person claiming any right, title, or interest in registered land adverse to the registered owner thereof, arising subsequent to the date of the original decree of registration, may, if no other provision is made for registering the same, file with the register of deeds of the county in which such decree was rendered or certificate of title thereon was issued, a verified statement in writing, setting forth fully the right, title, or interest so claimed, how or from whom it was acquired, and a reference to the number, book, and page of the certificate of title of the registered owner, together with a description of the land by metes and bounds, the adverse claimant’s place of residence and his post-office address, and, if a nonresident, he shall designate or appoint the said register of deeds to receive all notices directed to or to be served upon such adverse claimant in connection with the claim by him made, and such statement shall be noted and filed by said register of deeds as an adverse claim; but no action or proceeding to enforce such adverse claim shall be maintained unless the same be commenced within six months of the filing of the statement thereof.

History.

1919, c. 236, s. 1; C.S., s. 2401.

§ 43-28.
Suit to enforce adverse claim; summons and notice necessary.

Upon the institution of any action or proceeding to enforce such adverse claim, notice thereof shall be served upon the register of deeds, who shall enter upon the registry a memorandum that suit has been brought or proceeding instituted to determine the validity of such adverse claim; and summons or notice shall be served upon the holder or claimant of the registered title or certificate or other person against whom such adverse claim is alleged, as provided by law for the institution of suits or proceedings in the courts of this State.

If no notice of the institution of an action or proceeding to enforce an adverse claim be served upon the register of deeds and upon the holder of the registered title or certificate, or other person, as aforesaid, within seven months from the date of filing the statement of adverse claim, the register of deeds shall cancel upon the registry the adverse claim so filed and make a memorandum setting out that no notice of suit or proceeding to enforce the same had been served upon him within seven months as herein required, and that such adverse claim was therefore canceled; and thereafter no action or proceeding shall be begun or maintained to enforce such adverse claim in any of the courts of this State.

History.

1919, c. 236, s. 1; C.S., s. 2402.

§ 43-29.
Judgment in suit to enforce adverse claim; register to file.

The court shall certify its judgment to the register of deeds; if such adverse claim be held valid, the register of deeds shall make such entry upon the registry and upon the owner’s certificate of title as may be directed by the court, or he may file and record a certified copy of the judgment or order of the court thereon; if such adverse claim be held invalid the register of deeds shall cancel such adverse claim upon the registry, noting thereon that the same was done by order or judgment of the court, or he may file and record a certified copy of the judgment or order of the court thereon.

History.

1919, c. 236, s. 1; C.S., s. 2403.

§ 43-30.
Correction of registered title; limitation of adverse claims.

Any registered owner or other claimant under the registered title may at any time apply to the court in which the original decree was entered, by petition, setting out that registered interests of any description, whether vested, contingent, expectant or inchoate, have terminated and ceased, or that new interests have arisen or been created which do not appear upon the certificate, or that any error or omission was made in entering or issuing the certificate or any duplicate thereof, or that the name of any person on the certificate has been changed, or that the registered owner had married or, if registered as married, that the marriage has been terminated, or that a corporation which owned registered lands has been dissolved, without conveying the same or transferring its certificate within three years after the dissolution, or any other reasonable and proper ground of correction or relief; and such court may hear and determine the petition after notice to all parties in interest, and may make such order or decree as may be appropriate and lawful in the premises; but nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize any such court to open any original decree of registration which was entered more than 12 months prior to the filing of such petition, and nothing shall be done or ordered by the court to divest or impair the title or other interest of a purchaser who holds a transfer or certificate of title for value and in good faith. No action or proceeding shall be commenced or maintained to set up or establish any right, claim, interest or estate adverse to the order or decree or certificate of title issued thereon made or entered upon any petition or other proceeding authorized by this section, unless the same shall be brought and instituted within six months from the date of such order or decree authorized by this section.

History.

1919, c. 236, s. 1; C.S., s. 2404.